Utah statutes.
78B-13-303.   Duty to enforce.

(1)  A court of this state shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction that was in substantial conformity with this chapter or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this chapter and the determination has not been modified in accordance with this chapter.

(2)  A court may utilize any remedy available under other law of this state to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state.  The procedure provided by this part does not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

